Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Testing Sight and Hearing

§ 1421.
Repealed. 2015, No. 48, § 3.

§ 1422.
Periodic hearing and vision screening; guidelines.

School districts and primary care providers shall conduct periodic hearing and vision screening of school-aged children pursuant to research-based guidelines developed by the Commissioner of Health in consultation with the Secretary of Education. School districts and primary care providers will attempt to avoid duplicating services provided by the other and will share information as practicable and allowable by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 34

;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 44

, § 31, eff. May 21, 2009;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 134, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.